Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.080

Removal of directors by shareholders.

(1) The shareholders may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

(2) If a director is elected by holders of one or more authorized classes or series of shares, only the holders of those classes or series of shares may participate in the vote to remove the director.

(3) A director may be removed if the number of votes cast to remove exceeds the number of votes cast not to remove the director, except to the extent the articles of incorporation or bylaws require a greater number; except that if cumulative voting is authorized, and if less than the entire board is to be removed, no director may be removed if, in the case of a meeting, the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against the director's removal and, if action is taken by less than unanimous written consent, voting shareholders entitled to the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting do not consent to the removal.

(4) A director may be removed by the shareholders only at a special meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice must state that removal of the director is a purpose of the meeting.

[ 2024 c 22 s 17; 1995 c 47 s 7; 1989 c 165 s 87.]